Nebraska, session 109, LB1011.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1011 LB1011
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-121 The following schedule of compensation is hereby established
for injuries resulting in disability:
(1) For total disability, the compensation during such disability
shall be sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the wages received at the
time of injury, but such compensation shall not be more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less than the
minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01, except that
if at the time of injury the employee receives wages of less than the
minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01, then he or
she shall receive the full amount of such wages per week as compensation.
Nothing in this subdivision shall require payment of compensation after
disability shall cease;
(2) For disability partial in character, except the particular cases
mentioned in subdivision (3) of this section, the compensation shall be
sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the difference between the wages
received at the time of the injury and the earning power of the employee
thereafter, but such compensation shall not be more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01. This compensation
shall be paid during the period of such partial disability but not beyond
three hundred weeks. Should total disability be followed by partial
disability, the period of three hundred weeks mentioned in this
subdivision shall be reduced by the number of weeks during which
compensation was paid for such total disability;
(3) For disability resulting from permanent injury of the classes
listed in this subdivision, the compensation shall be in addition to the
amount paid for temporary disability, except that the compensation for
temporary disability shall continue until the later of (a) any permanent
disability, as measured by permanent impairment for a scheduled member
injury, has been determined or, in the event of a claim payable under a
-2-

LB1011 LB1011
2026 2026
loss of earning capacity, until a loss of earning capacity evaluation has
been issued or (b) thirty days after the employee has been given notice
as provided in subdivision (6) of this section cease as soon as the
extent of the permanent disability is ascertainable. For disability
resulting from permanent injury of the following classes, compensation
shall be: For the loss of a thumb, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of
daily wages during sixty weeks. For the loss of a first finger, commonly
called the index finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during thirty-five weeks. For the loss of a second finger, sixty-six and
two-thirds percent of daily wages during thirty weeks. For the loss of a
third finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during
twenty weeks. For the loss of a fourth finger, commonly called the little
finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during fifteen
weeks. The loss of the first phalange of the thumb or of any finger shall
be considered to be equal to the loss of one-half of such thumb or finger
and compensation shall be for one-half of the periods of time above
specified, and the compensation for the loss of one-half of the first
phalange shall be for one-fourth of the periods of time above specified.
The loss of more than one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the
entire finger or thumb, except that in no case shall the amount received
for more than one finger exceed the amount provided in this schedule for
the loss of a hand. For the loss of a great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of daily wages during thirty weeks. For the loss of one of the
toes other than the great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during ten weeks. The loss of the first phalange of any toe shall
be considered equal to the loss of one-half of such toe, and compensation
shall be for one-half of the periods of time above specified. The loss of
more than one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the entire toe.
For the loss of a hand, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during one hundred seventy-five weeks. For the loss of an arm, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during two hundred twenty-five
-3-

LB1011 LB1011
2026 2026
weeks. For the loss of a foot, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during one hundred fifty weeks. For the loss of a leg, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during two hundred fifteen weeks.
For the loss of an eye, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during one hundred twenty-five weeks. For the loss of an ear, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during twenty-five weeks. For the
loss of hearing in one ear, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during fifty weeks. For the loss of the nose, sixty-six and two-
thirds percent of daily wages during fifty weeks.
In any case in which there is a loss or loss of use of more than one
member or parts of more than one member set forth in this subdivision,
but not amounting to total and permanent disability, compensation
benefits shall be paid for the loss or loss of use of each such member or
part thereof, with the periods of benefits to run consecutively. The
total loss or permanent total loss of use of both hands, or both arms, or
both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or hearing in both ears, or of any
two thereof, in one accident, shall constitute total and permanent
disability and be compensated for according to subdivision (1) of this
section. In all other cases involving a loss or loss of use of both
hands, both arms, both feet, both legs, both eyes, or hearing in both
ears, or of any two thereof, total and permanent disability shall be
determined in accordance with the facts. Amputation between the elbow and
the wrist shall be considered as the equivalent of the loss of a hand,
and amputation between the knee and the ankle shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of a foot. Amputation at or above the elbow shall
be considered as the loss of an arm, and amputation at or above the knee
shall be considered as the loss of a leg. Permanent total loss of the use
of a finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of such finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye. In
all cases involving a permanent partial loss of the use or function of
any of the members mentioned in this subdivision, the compensation shall
-4-

LB1011 LB1011
2026 2026
bear such relation to the amounts named in such subdivision as the
disabilities bear to those produced by the injuries named therein.
If, in the compensation court's discretion, compensation benefits
payable for a loss or loss of use of more than one hand, arm, foot, or
leg, or any combination thereof, resulting from the same accident or
illness, do not adequately compensate the employee for such loss or loss
of use and such loss or loss of use results in at least a thirty percent
loss of earning capacity, the compensation court shall, upon request of
the employee, determine the employee's loss of earning capacity
consistent with the process for such determination under subdivision (1)
or (2) of this section, and in such a case the employee shall not be
entitled to compensation under this subdivision. Loss or loss of use of
multiple parts of the same arm, including the hand and fingers, or loss
or loss of use of multiple parts of the same leg, including the foot and
toes, resulting from the same accident or illness shall not entitle the
employee to compensation under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section.
If the employer and the employee are unable to agree upon the amount
of compensation to be paid in cases not covered by the schedule, the
amount of compensation shall be settled according to sections 48-173 to
48-185. Compensation under this subdivision shall not be more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less
than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01,
except that if at the time of the injury the employee received wages of
less than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section
48-121.01, then he or she shall receive the full amount of such wages per
week as compensation;
(4) For disability resulting from permanent disability, if
immediately prior to the accident the rate of wages was fixed by the day
or hour, or by the output of the employee, the weekly wages shall be
taken to be computed upon the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five
days, if the wages are paid by the day, or upon the basis of a workweek
-5-

LB1011 LB1011
2026 2026
of a minimum of forty hours, if the wages are paid by the hour, or upon
the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five days or forty hours,
whichever results in the higher weekly wage, if the wages are based on
the output of the employee; and
(5) The employee shall be entitled to compensation from his or her
employer for temporary disability while undergoing physical or medical
rehabilitation and while undergoing vocational rehabilitation whether
such vocational rehabilitation is voluntarily offered by the employer and
accepted by the employee or is ordered by the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court or any judge of the compensation court; and .
(6) Compensation for temporary disability shall only cease after the
employee has been given thirty days' notice. Upon termination of
temporary disability benefits, the employer shall provide copies of all
evidence which were relied upon in making the determination to cease
benefit payments. If the employer relies upon evidence from outside of
the treating physicians, the employee shall be entitled to seek a medical
finding by an independent medical examiner to be paid for by the
employer. Such independent medical examiner shall be chosen by the
employee.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-